District of Columbia statutes.
29A-201.21

Repealed

Executor, administrator, guardian, or trustee — Right to vote.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1287, ch. 854, § 625
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(1), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-201.21.
1981 Ed., § 29-221.
1973 Ed., § 29-221.